Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-1441
Rules and regulations.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the Prior Learning Act.

Laws 2026, LB937, § 25.
July 18, 2026